Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.115

Transactions in which director or officer has an interest.

(1) If a transaction is fair to a corporation at the time it is authorized, approved, or ratified, the fact that a director or an officer had a direct or indirect interest in the transaction is not grounds for either invalidating the transaction or imposing liability on the director or officer.

(2) In any proceeding seeking to invalidate a transaction with the corporation in which a director or an officer had a direct or indirect interest in a transaction with the corporation, the person asserting the validity of the transaction has the burden of proving fairness unless:

(a) The material facts of the transaction and the director's or officer's interest was disclosed or known to the board of directors, or a committee of the board, and the board or committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction; or

(b) The material facts of the transaction and the director's or officer's interest was disclosed or known to the shareholders entitled to vote, and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction.

(3) For purposes of this section, a director or an officer of a corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction with the corporation if:

(a) Another entity in which the director or officer has a material financial interest, or in which such person is a general partner, is a party to the transaction; or

(b) Another entity of which the director or officer is a director, officer, or trustee is a party to the transaction, and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

(4) For purposes of *subsection (3)(a) of this section, a transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified only if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors or on the committee who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve, or ratify the transaction, a quorum is present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under *subsection (3)(a) of this section if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in that subsection.

(5) For purposes of *subsection (3)(b) of this section, a transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified only if it receives the vote of a majority of shares entitled to be counted under this subsection. All outstanding shares entitled to vote under this title or the articles of incorporation are entitled to be counted under this subsection except shares owned by or voted under the control of a director or an officer who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction. Shares owned by or voted under the control of an entity described in subsection (3)(a) of this section shall not be counted to determine whether shareholders have authorized, approved, or ratified a transaction for purposes of *subsection (3)(b) of this section. The vote of the shares owned by or voted under the control of a director or an officer who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction and shares owned by or voted under the control of an entity described in subsection (3)(a) of this section, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this title and for purposes of determining a quorum.

[ 1986 c 279 s 36. Formerly RCW 30.12.115.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to subsection (3) appears to be erroneous. Reference to subsection (2) was apparently intended.